District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act”.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572

Former § 16-4604.01 has been recodified as § 16-4605.01 by D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(e).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.